Washington statutes.
RCW 41.48.150

Definition—"Employee."

"Employee," as used in RCW 41.48.120 and 41.48.140, includes all officers and employees of the state, except officials and employees compensated on a fee basis, for whom contributions are made to federal old age and survivors' insurance.

[ 1979 c 152 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 152: See note following RCW 41.48.120.